Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.060

Enforcement in accordance with RCW 43.05.100 and 43.05.110.

Enforcement action taken after July 23, 1995, by the director or the department shall be in accordance with RCW 43.05.100 and 43.05.110.

[ 1995 c 403 s 627.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.